Maryland, session 2026, HB0808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–160.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STEP THERAPY OR FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 15–142 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0808*

HOUSE BILL 808
(B) EXCEPT AS REQUIRED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1396A, BEGINNING JULY 1,
2026, THE PROGRAM MAY NOT APPLY A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT FOR
A PRESCRIPTION DRUG USED TO TREAT AN ADULT ENROLLEE’S DIAGNOSIS OF:
(1) BIPOLAR DISORDER;
(2) SCHIZOPHRENIA;
(3) MAJOR DEPRESSION;
(4) POST–TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER; OR
(5) A MEDICATION–INDUCED MOVEMENT DISORDER ASSOCIATED
WITH THE TREATMENT OF A SERIOUS MENTAL ILLNESS.
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE PROGRAM MAY NOT APPLY A STEP
THERAPY OR FAIL–FIRST PROTOCOL FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG USED TO TREAT AN
ENROLLEE’S DIAGNOSIS OF:
(1) BIPOLAR DISORDER;
(2) SCHIZOPHRENIA;
(3) MAJOR DEPRESSION;
(4) POST–TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER; OR
(5) A MEDICATION–INDUCED MOVEMENT DISORDER ASSOCIATED
WITH THE TREATMENT OF A SERIOUS MENTAL ILLNESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.